District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Year 2027 Local Budget Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Adoption of the local portion of the Fiscal Year 2027 budget.
The following expenditure levels are adopted pursuant to section 446(a) of the District of
Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 801; D.C. Official Code § 1-
204.46(a)), as the local portion of the budget for the government of the District of Columbia for
the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027.
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA BUDGET FOR THE FISCAL YEAR
ENDING SEPTEMBER 30, 2027
The following amounts are appropriated for the District of Columbia government for the
fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 (“Fiscal Year 2027”), out of the General Fund of the
District of Columbia (“General Fund”), except as otherwise specifically provided; provided, that:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in sections
446A, 446B, and 450A of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved November 22,
2000 (114 Stat. 2440; D.C. Official Code §§ 1-204.46a, 1-204.46b, and 1-204.50a), D.C. Official
Code §§ 47-369.01 and 47-369.02, and provisions of this act, the total amount appropriated in
this act for operating expenses for the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2027 shall not exceed
the sum of the total revenues of the District of Columbia for such fiscal year or $21,876,166,228
(of which $12,242,076,569 shall be from local funds, $782,454,817 shall be from dedicated
taxes, $1,354,806,079 shall be from federal grant funds, $4,188,440,725 shall be from Medicaid
payments, $765,043,115 shall be from other funds, $38,500,000 shall be from other federal
funds, $13,095,406 shall be from private grant funds, $1,357,336 shall be from private donations,
$153,297,999 shall be from funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress as federal
payments pursuant to the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026, passed
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-658) (“Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget
Request Act of 2026”), $133,060,665 shall be from enterprise and other funds – dedicated taxes,
and $2,204,033,517 shall be from enterprise and other funds);
(2) Of the local funds, such amounts as may be necessary may be derived from
the General Fund balance;
(3) Amounts appropriated under this act shall be increased or decreased to reflect
the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2027;
(4) Amounts appropriated under this act may be increased by the proceeds of one-
time transactions that are expended for emergency or unanticipated operating or capital needs;
provided, that such increases shall be approved by enactment of local District law and shall
comply with all reserve requirements contained in the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code § 1-201.01 et seq.);
(5) Local funds are appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, in such amounts as
may be necessary to pay vendor fees, including legal fees, that are obligated in this fiscal year, to
be paid as a fixed percentage of District revenue recovered from third parties on behalf of the
District under contracts that provide for payment of fees based upon and from such District
revenue as may be recovered by the vendor;
(6) Amounts appropriated under this act as operating funds may be transferred to
enterprise and capital funds and such amounts, once transferred, shall retain appropriation
authority consistent with the provisions of this act;
(7) There may be reprogrammed or transferred for operating expenses any local
funds transferred or reprogrammed in this or the 4 prior fiscal years from operating funds to
capital funds, and such amounts, once transferred or reprogrammed, shall retain appropriation
authority consistent with the provisions of this act; except, that there may not be reprogrammed
for operating expenses any funds derived from bonds, notes, or other obligations issued for
capital projects;
(8) The local funds (including dedicated taxes) and other funds appropriated by
this act may be reprogrammed and transferred as provided in Subchapter IV of Chapter 3 of Title
47 of the District of Columbia Official Code, or as otherwise provided by law, through
November 15, 2027;
(9) Local funds and other funds appropriated under this act may be expended by
the Mayor for the purpose of providing food and beverages, not to exceed $30 per employee per
day, to employees of the District of Columbia government while such employees are deployed in
response to or during a declared snow or other emergency;
(10) Local funds and other funds appropriated under this act may be expended by
the Mayor to provide food and lodging, in amounts not to exceed the General Services
Administration per diem rates, for youth, young adults, and their parents or guardians who
participate in a program of the District of Columbia government that involves overnight travel
outside the District of Columbia;
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(11) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, local funds are appropriated,
without regard to fiscal year, to the extent such funds are certified as available by the Chief
Financial Officer of the District of Columbia, to pay termination costs of multiyear contracts
entered into by the District of Columbia during this fiscal year, to design, construct, improve,
maintain, operate, manage, or finance infrastructure projects procured pursuant to the Public-
Private Partnership Act of 2014, effective March 11, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-228; D.C. Official Code
§ 2-271.01 et seq.), including, by way of example and not limitation, a project for the
replacement and modernization of the District of Columbia’s streetlight system, and such
termination costs may be paid from appropriations available for the performance of such
contracts or the payment of termination costs or from other appropriations then available for any
other purpose, not including the emergency cash reserve fund (D.C. Official Code § 1-
204.50a(a)) or the contingency cash reserve fund (D.C. Official Code § 1-204.50a(b)), which,
once allocated to these costs, shall be deemed appropriated for the purposes of paying
termination costs of such contracts and shall retain appropriations authority and remain available
until expended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, local funds are appropriated,
without regard to fiscal year, to the extent such funds are certified as available by the Chief
Financial Officer of the District of Columbia, to pay termination, transfer, or change of
ownership costs of multiyear contracts or task orders entered into by the District of Columbia
during this fiscal year, to design, construct, improve, maintain, operate, manage, and finance
infrastructure projects for the purpose of energy savings at District buildings pursuant to energy
savings performance contracts or task orders under DCAM-25-NC-RFP-0021, or on-site
generation and distribution of energy, including, by way of example and not limitation, a project
on the St. Elizabeths campus for the construction and operation of an energy resources
microgrid, and such termination, transfer, or change of ownership costs may be paid from
appropriations available for the performance of such contracts or the payment of termination,
transfer, or change of ownership costs or from other appropriations then available for any other
purpose, not including the emergency cash reserve fund (D.C. Official Code § 1-204.50a(a)) or
the contingency cash reserve fund (D.C. Official Code § 1-204.50a(b)), which, once allocated to
these costs, shall be deemed appropriated for the purposes of paying termination, transfer or
change of ownership costs of such contracts and shall retain appropriations authority and remain
available until expended;
(13) During Fiscal Year 2027, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
District of Columbia may enter into annual and multiyear agreements with the National Park
Service for the purposes of planning, designing, constructing, maintaining, improving, and
operating District of Columbia transportation infrastructure and related appurtenances on
National Park Service land in the District of Columbia, and may in each fiscal year of such
agreement expend such funds to implement the agreement as may be appropriated and available
in that fiscal year for such purposes;
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(14) Any unspent amount remaining in a non-lapsing fund listed in the
appropriations below at the end of Fiscal Year 2026 is to be continually available, allocated, and
appropriated, and may be expended, for the purposes of such fund in Fiscal Year 2027 in
addition to any amounts deposited in and appropriated to such fund in Fiscal Year 2027; and
(15) The Chief Financial Officer shall take such steps as are necessary to ensure
that the foregoing requirements are met, including the apportioning by the Chief Financial
Officer of the appropriations and funds made available during Fiscal Year 2027:
GOVERNMENTAL DIRECTION AND SUPPORT
For governmental direction and support, $1,261,290,519 (including $1,026,252,317 from
local funds, $220,000 from dedicated taxes, $42,938,873 from federal grant funds, $190,960,993
from other funds, and $918,336 from private donations), to be allocated as follows:
(1) Board of Elections: $15,678,839 from local funds;
(2) Board of Ethics and Government Accountability: $4,092,650 (including
$3,934,552 from local funds and $158,098 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited,
without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Ethics Fund, the Lobbyist
Administration and Enforcement Fund, and the Open Government Fund;
(3) Captive Insurance Agency: $11,440,613 (including $10,595,024 from local
funds and $845,589 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal
year, into the Medical Captive Insurance Claims Reserve Fund are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027; provided further, that all
funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Captive Trust Fund and
the Subrogation Fund;
(4) Contract Appeals Board: $2,018,978 from local funds;
(5) Council of the District of Columbia: $41,292,972 from local funds; provided,
that not to exceed $50,000 of this amount shall be available for the Chairman for official
reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds
Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided
further, that funds appropriated under this act may be used to pay expenses for employees of the
Council of the District of Columbia to obtain or maintain professional credentials in the District
that are related to their employment at the Council, including bar admission fees, bar dues and
fees, court admission fees, and examinations to obtain such credentials; provided further, that
funds appropriated under this act may be used for uniform apparel for employees of the Council
of the District of Columbia; provided further, that Councilmembers of the Council of the District
of Columbia may use the electric car charging station located outside the John A. Wilson
Building to charge their personal vehicles in accordance with policies established by the
Secretary to the Council; provided further, that amounts provided under this paragraph shall be
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
available for the making of payment of legal settlements or judgments that have been entered
against the Council; provided further, that not to exceed $390,000 of this amount shall be
available to assess and enhance the physical security of Councilmembers’ permanent residences,
of which not to exceed $260,000 shall be available to assess the physical security of each
Councilmember’s permanent residence and not to exceed $10,000 shall be available for each
Councilmember to implement the recommendations of the authorized security assessment to
enhance the physical security of the Councilmember’s permanent residence, consistent with a
policy promulgated by the Secretary to the Council; provided further, that all funds deposited,
without regard to fiscal year, into the Council Technology Projects Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(6) Department of General Services: $483,042,960 (including $400,022,293 from
local funds, $220,000 from dedicated taxes, and $82,800,667 from other funds); provided, that
all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Eastern
Market Enterprise Fund and the West End Library and Fire Station Maintenance Fund;
(7) Department of Human Resources: $20,238,819 (including $11,246,428 from
local funds and $8,992,391 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2027: Agreement with Independent Agencies Fund, Defined
Benefits Retirement Fund, Health Benefit Assessment Fund, and Reimbursements from Other
Governments Fund;
(8) Employees’ Compensation Fund: $18,276,541 from local funds; provided, that
all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Employees’ Compensation Fund are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(9) Executive Office of the Mayor: $32,731,408 (including $28,599,214 from
local funds, $4,109,080 from federal grant funds, and $23,114 from other funds); provided, that
not to exceed $25,000 of such amount, from local funds, shall be available for the Mayor for
official reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary
Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10);
provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditures until September 30, 2027:
the Emancipation Day Fund, the Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and
Questioning Affairs Fund, and the Office of Veterans Affairs Fund;
(10) Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel: $1,941,427 from local funds;
(11) Metropolitan Washington Council of Governments: $1,483,960 from local
funds;
(12) Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions: $2,774,532 from local
funds; provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
2027: the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Technical Support and Assistance Fund and the
Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commission Security Fund;
(13) Office of Campaign Finance: $8,023,726 from local funds; provided, that all
funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the Fair Elections Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(14) Office of Contracting and Procurement: $26,650,538 (including $20,853,738
from local funds and $5,796,800 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited during
Fiscal Year 2027 into the Surplus Property Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(15) Office of Disability Rights: $3,734,903 (including $3,108,591 from local
funds and $626,312 from federal grant funds);
(16) Office of Employee Appeals: $2,925,407 from local funds;
(17) Office of Finance and Resource Management: $32,896,312 (including
$32,673,609 from local funds and $222,703 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited
during Fiscal Year 2027 into the Utilities Payment for Non-DC Agencies Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(18) Office of Labor Relations and Collective Bargaining: $3,434,505 from local
funds;
(19) Office of Risk Management: $4,047,086 from local funds;
(20) Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia: $159,785,587
(including $103,548,885 from local funds, $31,091,887 from federal grant funds, $24,226,479
from other funds, and $918,336 from private donations); provided, that not to exceed $25,000 of
this amount, from local funds, shall be available for the Attorney General for official reception
and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of
1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided
further, that local and other funds appropriated under this act may be used to pay expenses for
District government attorneys at the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia
to obtain professional credentials, including bar dues and court admission fees, that enable these
attorneys to practice law in other state and federal jurisdictions and appear outside the District in
state and federal courts; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year,
into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Child Support-Reimbursements and Fees Fund, the
Child Support-Interest Income Fund, the Child Support-Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families Fund, the Drug-, Firearm-, or Prostitution-Related Nuisance Abatement Fund, and the
Litigation Support Fund; provided further, that this amount may be further increased by amounts
deposited into the Attorney General Restitution Fund, and the Tenant Receivership Abatement
Fund, which shall be continually available, without regard to fiscal year, until expended;
(21) Office of the Chief Financial Officer: $221,181,516 (including $181,092,800
from local funds, $550,000 from federal grant funds, and $39,538,716 from other funds);
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
provided, that not to exceed $10,600 of such amount, from local funds, shall be available for the
Chief Financial Officer for official reception and representation expenses and for purposes
consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509;
D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided further, that amounts appropriated by this act may be
increased by the amount required to pay banking fees for maintaining the funds of the District of
Columbia; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027: the Internet Gaming Revenue Fund, the Other Post-Employment Benefits
Fund, and the Child Trust Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year
2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027: the DC Lottery Reimbursement Fund, the Defined
Contribution Plan Administration Fund, the Delinquent Debt Fund, the Dishonored Check Fees
Fund, the Health Benefits Fees Fund, the Payroll Services Fees Fund, the Recorder of Deeds
Automation Fund, the Service Contracts Fund, the Tobacco Fund Reimbursement Fund, and the
United Medical Center Closeout Fund;
(22) Office of the Chief Technology Officer: $113,215,894 (including
$83,590,596 from local funds, $3,361,769 from federal grant funds, and $26,263,529 from other
funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2027: the DC-NET Services and Innovation Fund and the Technology Infrastructure Services
Support Fund;
(23) Office of the City Administrator: $10,301,861 from local funds; provided,
that not to exceed $10,600 of such amount, from local funds, shall be available for the City
Administrator for official reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with
the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official
Code § 1-333.10);
(24) Office of the District of Columbia Auditor: $7,563,130 from local funds;
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Audit Engagement Fund
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2027;
(25) Office of the Inspector General: $23,622,254 (including $19,422,428 from
local funds, $3,199,826 from federal grant funds, and $1,000,000 from other funds); provided,
that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Inspector General Support Fund
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2027;
(26) Office of the Secretary: $5,548,869 (including $4,455,962 from local funds
and $1,092,907 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027
into the Distribution Fee Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027;
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(27) Office of the Senior Advisor: $1,502,621 from local funds;
(28) Public Employee Relations Board: $1,510,732 from local funds;
(29) Statehood Initiatives: $266,883 from local funds; provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the New Columbia Statehood Fund are authorized
for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027; and
(30) Uniform Law Commission: $65,000 from local funds.
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND REGULATION
For economic development and regulation, $546,720,722 (including $358,040,416 from
local funds, $49,804,378 from dedicated taxes, $42,158,445 from federal grant funds,
$58,217,483 from other funds, and $38,500,000 from other federal funds), to be allocated as
follows:
(1) Business Improvement Districts Transfer: $43,230,000 (including $2,230,000
from local funds and $41,000,000 from other funds); provided, that, in the event that revenue
dedicated by local law to a business improvement district exceeds the amount set forth in this
paragraph, the General Fund budget authority may be increased as needed to transfer all such
revenue, pursuant to local law, to the business improvement district.
(2) Commission on the Arts and Humanities: $47,586,443 (including $3,533,666
from local funds, $43,025,777 from dedicated taxes and $1,027,000 from federal grant funds);
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Arts and Humanities
Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September
30, 2027; provided further, that budgeted funds in the available fund balance of the Arts and
Humanities Fund may be obligated in Fiscal Year 2027 pursuant to grant awards, through
September 30, 2030, and that such funds so obligated are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2030;
(3) Department of Housing and Community Development: $135,641,866
(including $53,615,452 from local funds, $39,668,714 from federal grant funds, $38,500,000
from other federal funds, and $3,857,700 from other funds); provided further, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Home Again Revolving
Fund, the Housing Preservation Fund, the Negotiated Employee Affordable Housing Fund, and
the Section 108 Debt Reserve Account; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the Rental Housing Registration Fund are authorized for expenditure starting
at the beginning of the applicable time period set forth section in 203e(d) of the Rental Housing
Act of 1985, effective October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-168; D.C. Official Code § 42-
3502.03e(d)), and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027; provided
further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized
for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the
Department of Housing and Community Development Unified Fund and the Home Purchase
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Assistance Fund;
(4) Department of Small and Local Business Development: $24,844,774
(including $23,124,558 from local funds, $720,217 from federal grant funds, and $1,000,000
from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027: the Art All Night Fund, the Small Business Capital Access Fund, the Small
Business Licensing Fee Reimbursement Relief Fund, the Streetscape Business Development
Relief Fund, and the Ward 7 and Ward 8 Entrepreneur Grant Fund;
(5) Housing Authority Payment: $213,820,432 from local funds;
(6) Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment: $12,877,712
(including $6,555,107 from local funds and $6,322,605 from other funds); provided, that all
funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Film, Television and the Entertainment
Rebate Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the
OCTFME Special Account are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(7) Office of Planning: $12,124,347 (including $11,468,347 from local funds,
$626,000 from federal grant funds, and $30,000 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and
shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Historic Landmark-District
Protection (Local) Fund, the Targeted Homeowner Grant Fund, and the Historical Landmark-
District Protection (O-Type) Fund;
(8) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development:
$44,430,756 (including $32,241,105 from local funds, $6,778,601 from dedicated taxes,
$116,514 from federal grant funds, and $5,294,536 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Economic Development
Special Account, the Industrial Revenue Bond Account, the Soccer Stadium Financing Fund, the
Vitality Fund, and the Walter Reed Reinvestment Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited
during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the St. Elizabeths East Campus
Redevelopment Fund and the Walter Reed Redevelopment Fund;
(9) Office of the Tenant Advocate: $4,724,595 (including $4,011,953 from local
funds and $712,642 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year
2027 into the Rental Unit Fee Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(10) Office of Zoning: $4,210,378 from local funds;
(11) Real Property Tax Appeals Commission: $2,009,173 from local funds; and
(12) Rental Housing Commission: $1,220,246 from local funds.
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
PUBLIC SAFETY AND JUSTICE
For public safety and justice, $1,980,182,048 (including $1,702,102,810 from local
funds, $230,644,242 from federal grant funds, $300,000 from Medicaid payments, $42,836,997
from other funds, $948,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the
Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Judicial Commissions” in the Fiscal Year
2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026, $600,000 from federal payment funds
requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for the
District of Columbia National Guard” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request
Act of 2026, and $2,749,999 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the
Congress under the heading “Federal Payment to the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council” in
the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026); provided, that the foregoing
amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds
appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2027, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure: $1,244,426 (including
$646,426 from local funds and $598,000 from federal payment funds requested to be
appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Judicial Commissions” in
the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026); provided, that the foregoing
amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds
appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2027;
(2) Corrections Information Council: $1,140,894 from local funds;
(3) Criminal Justice Coordinating Council: $4,857,836 (including $1,957,837
from local funds, $150,000 from federal grant funds, and $2,749,999 from federal payment funds
requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment to the
Criminal Justice Coordinating Council” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request
Act of 2026); provided, that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the
amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2027;
(4) Department of Corrections: $230,436,605 (including $213,230,838 from local
funds and $17,205,767 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2027
into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Correction Reimbursement-Juveniles Fund, the
Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund, and the Inmate Welfare Fund;
(5) Department of Forensic Sciences: $28,882,441 (including $28,514,096 from
local funds and $368,345 from federal grant funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without
regard to fiscal year, into the Department of Forensic Sciences Laboratory Fund are authorized
for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(6) Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services: $102,485,765 from local funds;
(7) District of Columbia National Guard: $23,763,917 (including $6,099,294 from
local funds, $17,034,623 from federal grant funds, $30,000 from other funds, and $600,000 from
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal
Payment for the District of Columbia National Guard” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion
Budget Request Act of 2026); provided, that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or
decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the
agency for Fiscal Year 2027; provided further, that the Mayor shall reimburse the District of
Columbia National Guard for expenses incurred in connection with services that are performed
in emergencies by the National Guard in a militia status and are requested by the Mayor, in
amounts that shall be jointly determined and certified as due and payable for these services by
the Mayor and the Commanding General of the District of Columbia National Guard; provided
further, that such sums as may be necessary for reimbursement to the District of Columbia
National Guard under the preceding proviso shall be available pursuant to this act, and the
availability of the sums shall be deemed as constituting payment in advance for emergency
services involved;
(8) District of Columbia Sentencing Commission: $1,739,550 from local funds;
(9) Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department: $402,630,093 (including
$302,308,345 from local funds, $98,522,288 from federal grant funds, and $1,799,460 from
other funds); provided, that all funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2027 into the Fire and Emergency
Medical Services Department EMS Reform Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(10) Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency: $101,022,414
(including $10,749,565 from local funds and $90,272,849 from federal grant funds);
(11) Judicial Nomination Commission: $437,355 (including $87,355 from local
funds and $350,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress
under the heading “Federal Payment for Judicial Commissions” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal
Portion Budget Request Act of 2026); provided, that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or
decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the
agency for Fiscal Year 2027;
(12) Metropolitan Police Department: $687,896,179 (including $673,917,599
from local funds, $7,550,633 from federal grant funds, and $6,427,947 from other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027:
the Asset Forfeiture Fund and the Miscellaneous Fund;
(13) Office of Administrative Hearings: $13,494,563 (including $13,194,563 from
local funds and $300,000 from Medicaid payments);
(14) Office of Human Rights: $9,652,059 (including $9,232,910 from local funds
and $419,150 from federal grant funds);
(15) Office of Neighborhood Safety and Engagement: $22,846,605 from local
funds; provided, that the Office of Neighborhood Safety and Engagement is authorized to spend
appropriated funds for the purposes set forth in section 101 of the Neighborhood Engagement
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Achieves Results Amendment Act of 2016, effective June 30, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-125; D.C.
Official Code § 7-2411); provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year,
into the Neighborhood Safety and Engagement Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(16) Office of Police Complaints: $3,295,101 from local funds;
(17) Office of the Chief Medical Examiner: $16,252,964 (including $15,697,255
from local funds, $240,409 from federal grant funds, and $315,301 from other funds); provided,
that all funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2027 into the Medical Examiner Pathology and
Toxicology Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027;
(18) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice: $14,176,136 from
local funds;
(19) Office of Unified Communications: $60,186,154 (including $43,727,632
from local funds and $16,458,522 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without
regard to fiscal year, into the Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling
Systems Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the
Public Services Telecommunications Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(20) Office of Victim Services and Justice Grants: $109,774,992 (including
$93,089,046 from local funds, $16,085,946 from federal grant funds, and $600,000 from other
funds); provided, that $31,786,532 shall be made available to award a grant to the District of
Columbia Bar Foundation for the purpose of administering the Access to Justice Initiative,
including the Access to Justice Grants Program, the District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan
Repayment Assistance Program, and the Civil Legal Counsel Projects Program; provided further,
that the funds authorized for expenditure for the Access to Justice Initiative shall remain
available for expenditure, without regard to fiscal year, until September 30, 2027; provided
further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Crime Victims Assistance
Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September
30, 2027; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following
funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September
30, 2027: the Community-Based Violence Reduction Fund and the Private Security Camera
Incentive Fund; and
(21) Police Officers’ and Firefighters’ Retirement System: $143,966,000 from
local funds.
PUBLIC EDUCATION SYSTEMS
For the public education systems, $4,452,917,529 (including $3,862,075,104 from local
funds, $419,832,455 from federal grant funds, $90,071,434 from other funds, $5,641,536 from
12

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
private grant funds, $297,000 from private donations, $40,000,000 from federal payment funds
requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Resident
Tuition Support” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026 for the
purposes specified in sections 3 and 5 of the District of Columbia College Access Act of 1999,
approved November 12, 1999 (113 Stat 1328; D.C. Official Code §§ 38-2702 and 38-2704), and
$35,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the
heading “Federal Payment for School Improvement” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion
Budget Request Act of 2026 for the purposes specified in section 3004(b) of the Scholarships for
Opportunity and Results Act, approved April 15, 2011 (125 Stat 200; D.C. Official Code § 38-
1853.04(b))); provided, that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the
amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2027, to be allocated
as follows:
(1) Department of Employment Services: $183,604,917 (including $68,925,510
from local funds, $49,186,006 from federal grant funds, $64,665,376 from other funds, and
$828,025 from private grant funds); provided, that the Department of Employment Services is
authorized to spend appropriated funds to provide food and non-alcoholic beverages and
monetary and non-monetary incentives for participants in its programs, as provided by other
District or federal law, and to provide food and non-alcoholic beverages to its employees, as
provided by other District or federal law; provided further, that all funds deposited, without
regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Reed Act Fund, the Unemployment and
Workforce Development Administrative Fund, the Unemployment Insurance Interest Account,
the Unemployment Insurance Special Administrative Expense Account, the Universal Paid
Leave Administration Fund, the Workers’ Compensation Administration Fund, and the Workers’
Compensation Special Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027
into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Apprenticeship Fees Fund, the Jobs Trust Fund, and
the Wage Theft Prevention Fund;
(2) Department of Parks and Recreation: $77,954,208 (including $74,954,208
from local funds and $3,000,000 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited in Fiscal
Year 2027 into the Parks and Recreation Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027; provided further, that the Department of
Parks and Recreation is authorized to spend appropriated funds from the Parks and Recreation
Fund for the purposes set forth in section 4 of the Recreation Act of 1994, effective March 23,
1995 (D.C. Law 10-246; D.C. Official Code § 10-303);
(3) District of Columbia Public Charter School Board: $16,809,173 (including
$2,789,500 from local funds and $14,019,673 from other funds);
(4) District of Columbia Public Charter Schools: $1,463,680,186 from local
funds; provided, that there shall be quarterly disbursement of funds to the District of Columbia
13

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
public charter schools, with the first payment to occur within 15 days of the beginning of the
fiscal year; provided further, that if the entirety of this allocation has not been provided as
payments to any public charter schools currently in operation through the per pupil funding
formula, the funds shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027, for public
education in accordance with section 2403(b)(2) of the District of Columbia School Reform Act
of 1995, approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code § 38-1804.03(b)(2));
provided further, that of the amounts made available to District of Columbia public charter
schools, $230,000 shall be made available to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer as
authorized by section 2403(b)(6) of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995,
approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code § 38-1804.03(b)(6)); provided
further, that, notwithstanding the amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other
provision of law, there shall be appropriated to the District of Columbia public charter schools on
July 1, 2027, an amount equal to 30 percent, or for new charter school local education agencies
that opened for the first time after December 31, 2026, an amount equal to 45 percent, of the
total amount of the local funds appropriations provided for payments to public charter schools in
the budget of the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2028 (as adopted by the District), and the
amount of such payment shall be chargeable against the final amount provided for such
payments for Fiscal Year 2028; provided further, that the annual financial audit for the
performance of an individual District of Columbia public charter school shall be funded by the
charter school;
(5) District of Columbia Public Library: $86,996,807 (including $84,491,336
from local funds, $1,258,471 from federal grant funds, $1,200,000 from other funds, and
$47,000 from private donations); provided, that not to exceed $8,500 of such amount, from local
funds, shall be available for the Chief Librarian of the District of Columbia Public Library for
official reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary
Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10);
provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available until expended: the Books From Birth
Fund, the Copies and Printing Fund, the DCPL Revenue-Generating Activities Fund, the E-Rate
Reimbursement Fund, and the Library Collections Account; provided further, that no later than
February 2, 2027, the Chief Financial Officer shall increase the budget authority for the Books
From Birth Fund, the Copies and Printing Fund, the DCPL Revenue-Generating Activities Fund,
the E-Rate Reimbursement Fund, and the Library Collections Account by the amount of
resources remaining in each fund as of the close of Fiscal Year 2026;
(6) District of Columbia Public Schools: $1,508,707,114 (including
$1,450,327,880 from local funds, $33,080,114 from federal grant funds, $6,051,385 from other
funds, $1,747,735 from private grant funds, and $17,500,000 from federal payment funds
requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for School
Improvement” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026); provided,
14

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal
payment funds appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2027; provided further, that not to
exceed $10,600 of such local funds shall be available for the Chancellor for official reception
and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of
1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided
further, that, notwithstanding the amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other
provision of law, there shall be appropriated to the District of Columbia Public Schools on July
1, 2027, an amount equal to 10 percent of the total amount of the local funds appropriations
provided for the District of Columbia Public Schools in the budget of the District of Columbia
for Fiscal Year 2028 (as adopted by the District), and the amount of such payment shall be
chargeable against the final amount provided for the District of Columbia Public Schools for
Fiscal Year 2028; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027: the At-Risk Supplemental Allocation Preservation Fund, the Afterschool
Program-Copayment Fund, the District of Columbia Public Schools Food Services Fund, the
District of Columbia Public Schools Sales and Sponsorship Fund, the E-Rate Education Fund,
and the Reserve Officer Training Corps Fund; provided further, that the District of Columbia
Public Schools is authorized to spend appropriated funds consistent with section 105(c)(5) of the
Public Education Reform Amendment Act of 2007, effective June 12, 2007 (D.C. Law 17-9;
D.C. Official Code § 38-174(c)(5)); provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year
2027 into the DCPS School Facility Colocation Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(7) District of Columbia State Athletics Commission: $1,797,074 (including
$1,597,074 from local funds and $200,000 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited
during Fiscal Year 2027 into the State Athletics Activities, Programs, and Office Fund are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(8) Non-Public Tuition: $57,464,309 (including $56,864,309 from local funds and
$600,000 from federal grant funds);
(9) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Education: $34,580,721 (including
$34,275,721 from local funds, $55,000 from private grant funds, and $250,000 from private
donations);
(10) Office of the State Superintendent of Education: $705,695,099 (including
$318,542,459 from local funds, $325,706,864 from federal grant funds, $935,000 from other
funds, $3,010,776 from private grant funds, $40,000,000 from federal payment funds requested
to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Resident Tuition
Support” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026, and $17,500,000
from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading
“Federal Payment for School Improvement” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget
Request Act of 2026); provided, that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or decreased to
15

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal
Year 2027; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027: the Access to Quality Child Care Fund, the Charter School Credit
Enhancement Fund, the Special Education Enhancement Fund, and the Student Enrollment
Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2027: the Advanced Technical Centers Fund, the Community Schools Fund, and the Early
Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund;
(11) Special Education Transportation: $133,779,046 (including $123,778,046
from local funds and $10,001,000 in federal grant funds); provided, that, notwithstanding the
amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other provision of law, there shall be
appropriated to the Special Education Transportation agency under the direction of the Office of
the State Superintendent of Education, on July 1, 2027, an amount equal to 10 percent of the total
amount of the local funds appropriations provided for the Special Education Transportation
agency in the budget for the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2028 (as adopted by the
District), and the amount of such payment shall be chargeable against the final amount provided
for the Special Education Transportation agency for Fiscal Year 2028; provided further, that
amounts appropriated under this paragraph may be used to offer financial incentives as necessary
to reduce the number of routes serving 2 or fewer students;
(12) State Board of Education: $3,718,204 from local funds;
(13) Teachers’ Retirement System: $77,052,000 from local funds;
(14) Unemployment Compensation Fund: $4,980,390 from local funds; and
(15) University of the District of Columbia Subsidy Account: $96,098,280 from
local funds; provided, that this appropriation shall not be available to subsidize the education of
nonresidents of the District at the University of the District of Columbia, unless the Board of
Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia adopts, for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027, a tuition-rate schedule that establishes the tuition rate for nonresident
students at a level no lower than the nonresident tuition rate charged at comparable public
institutions of higher education in the metropolitan area; provided further, that, notwithstanding
the amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other provision of law, there shall be
appropriated to the University of the District of Columbia on July 1, 2027, an amount equal to 10
percent of the total amount of the local funds appropriations provided for the University of the
District of Columbia in the budget of the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2028 (as adopted
by the District), and the amount of such payment shall be chargeable against the final amount
provided for the University of the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2028; provided further,
that not to exceed $10,600 of such local funds shall be available for the President of the
University of the District of Columbia for official reception and representation expenses and for
purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87
16

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10).
HUMAN SUPPORT SERVICES
For human support services, $7,561,207,029 (including $2,568,416,702 from local funds,
$251,661,162 from dedicated taxes, $492,933,695 from federal grant funds, $4,188,140,725
from Medicaid payments, $53,596,509 from other funds, $2,330,236 from private grant funds,
$128,000 from private donations, and $4,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be
appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Testing and Treatment of
HIV/AIDS” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026); provided, that
the foregoing amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment
funds appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2027, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Child and Family Services Agency: $206,232,924 (including $156,010,169
from local funds, $50,117,755 from federal grant funds, $75,000 in private grant funds, and
$30,000 in private donations);
(2) Department of Aging and Community Living: $65,271,757 (including
$51,018,720 from local funds, $11,088,701 from federal grant funds, and $3,164,336 from
Medicaid payments);
(3) Department of Behavioral Health: $365,920,227 (including $272,691,579
from local funds, $72,131,912 from federal grant funds, $5,786,810 from Medicaid payments,
$14,873,902 from other funds, $343,024 from private grant funds, and $93,000 from private
donations); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following
funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available or expenditure until September
30, 2027: the 988 Lifeline and Crisis Services Fund, the Addiction Prevention and Recovery
Administration-Choice in Drug Treatment (HCSN) Fund, the DMH Medicare and 3rd Party
Reimbursement Fund, the DMH Federal Beneficiary Reimbursement Fund, and the Opioid
Abatement Fund;
(4) Department of Health: $281,114,672 (including $92,847,153 from local funds,
$159,125,072 from federal grant funds, $23,230,235 from other funds, $1,912,212 from private
grant funds, and $4,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the
Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Testing and Treatment of HIV/AIDS” in the
Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026); provided, that the foregoing
amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds
appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2027; provided further, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the AIDS Drug Assistance
Program Fund, the Animal Education and Outreach Fund, the Civil Monetary Penalties Fund, the
Health Occupations Regulation Fund, the DC Health and Wellness Center Fund, the Health
Professional Recruitment Fund (Medical Loan Repayment), the Human Services Facility Fee
Fund, the JUUL Settlement Fund, and the Smoking Cessation Fund; provided further, that all
17

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Board of Medicine
Fund, the ICF/MR Fees and Finds Fund, the Pharmacy Protection Fund, the State Health
Planning and Development Agency Admission Fees Fund, and the State Health Planning and
Development Agency Fees Fund;
(5) Department of Health Care Finance: $5,584,075,759 (including
$1,173,349,845 from local funds, $251,661,162 from dedicated taxes, $10,238,139 from federal
grant funds, $4,144,046,042 from Medicaid payments, and $4,780,571 from other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027:
the DC HealthCare Alliance Reform Fund, the Home and Community-Based Services
Enhancement Fund, the Hospital Provider Fee Fund, the Hospital Fund, the Individual Insurance
Market Affordability and Stability Fund, the Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund, and the
Stevie Sellow’s Quality Improvement Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during
Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Bill of Rights (Grievance and Appeals)
Fund, the Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund, the Medicaid Provider Fraud
Reimbursement, and the New Hospital at St. Elizabeths Startup Reserve Fund;
(6) Department of Human Services: $824,532,105 (including $651,433,281 from
local funds, $155,393,835 from federal grant funds, $330,000 from other funds, and $17,369,989
from federal Medicaid payments, and $5,000 from private donations); provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the SNAP Reinvestment Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027; provided
further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2027 into the SSI Payback Fund are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(7) Department on Disability Services: $231,057,295 (including $168,063,666
from local funds, $34,838,280 from federal grant funds, $17,773,547 from Medicaid payments,
and $10,381,801 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal
year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Contribution to Costs of Supports Fund, the Cost of
Care for Non-Medicaid Clients Fund, and the Randolph Shepherd Unassigned Facilities Fund;
(8) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Health and Human Services: $2,119,196 from
local funds; and
(9) Office of the Ombudsperson for Children: $883,094 from local funds.
OPERATIONS AND INFRASTRUCTURE
For operations and infrastructure, $1,613,717,886 (including $1,126,650,043 from local
funds, $79,711,000 from dedicated taxes, $125,475,403 from federal grant funds, $276,743,806
from other funds, $5,123,634 from private grant funds, and $14,000 from private donations), to
18

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
be allocated as follows:
(1) Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration: $11,987,417 (including
$2,713,516 from local funds and $9,273,901 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Alcoholic Beverage and
Cannabis Administration Fund, the Dedicated Taxes Fund, and the Medical Cannabis
Administration Fund;
(2) Department of Buildings: $66,952,662 (including $49,485,010 from local
funds, $1,599,171 from federal grant funds, and $15,868,480 from other funds); provided, that
all funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Expedited Building
Permit Review Fund, the Green Building Fund, and the Nuisance Abatement Fund;
(3) Department of Energy and Environment: $202,446,236 (including
$31,136,486 from local funds, $89,785,437 from federal grant funds, $76,400,679 from other
funds, and $5,123,634 from private grant funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without
regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Air Quality Construction Permits Fund,
the Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Fund, the Benchmarking Enforcement Fund, the
Clean Land Fund/Brownfield Revitalization Fund, the District Energy Fund, the District of
Columbia Wetland Stream and Mitigation Trust Fund, the Economy II Fund, the Energy
Assistance Trust Fund, the Fishing License Fund, the Hazardous Waste and Toxic Chemical
Source Reduction Fund, the Indoor Mold Assessment and Remediation Fund, the Lead
Poisoning Prevention Fund, the Leaking Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund, the Municipal
Aggregation Fund, the Pesticide Product Registration Fund, the Rail Safety and Security Fund,
the Renewable Energy Development Fund, the Residential Aid Discount Fund, the Residential
Essential Services Fund, the Soil Erosion and Sediment Control Fund, the Special Energy
Assessment Fund, the Stormwater Fees Fund, the Stormwater In-Lieu Fee Payment Fund, the
Storm Water Permit Review Fund, the Sustainable Energy Trust Fund, the Sustainable Materials
and Building Fund, the Underground Storage Tank Regulation Fund, and the WASA Utility
Discount Program Fund; provided further, that funds in the available fund balance of the
Renewable Energy Development Fund may be obligated in Fiscal Year 2027, pursuant to grant
awards, through September 30, 2030, and that such funds so obligated are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2030;
(4) Department of For-Hire Vehicles: $14,351,459 (including $3,881,453 from
local funds and $10,470,006 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer Service Fund
and the Taxicab Assessment Act Fund;
(5) Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking: $35,246,094 (including
19

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
$127,760 from local funds and $35,118,334 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited,
without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Capital Access Fund, the Captive
Insurance Fund, the Foreclosure Mediation Fund, the HMO Assessment Fund, the Insurance
Assessment Fund, the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund, the Loan Participation Fund, and the
Securities and Banking Fund;
(6) Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection: $30,870,116 (including
$16,457,904 from local funds and $14,412,212 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited in Fiscal Year 2027 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Basic Business License Fund, the
Corporate Recordation Fund, the Combat Sports Commission Fund, the Occupational and
Professional Licensing Administration Special Account, and the Vending Regulation Fund;
provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2027: the Appraisal Fee Fund and the Real Estate Guaranty and Education Fund;
(7) Department of Motor Vehicles: $70,650,721 (including $62,320,131 from
local funds and $8,330,590 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the Department of Motor Vehicles Kiosk Fund and the Motor Vehicle
Inspection Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027;
(8) Department of Public Works: $193,345,106 (including $179,232,078 from
local funds and $14,113,029 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the Solid Waste Disposal Cost Recovery Special
Account and the Super Can Program Fund;
(9) District Department of Transportation: $158,411,106 (including $99,407,301
from local funds, $33,416,805 from federal grant funds, and $25,587,000 from other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027:
the Bicycle Sharing Fund, the Bus Service Enhancement Fund, the DC Circulator Fund, the DC
Water Facility Work Fund, the DDOT Enterprise Fund-Non Tax Revenues Fund, the Greater U
Street Parking Benefit Fund, the Parking Meter and Transit Services Pay-by-Phone Transaction
Fee Fund, the Sustainable Transportation Fund, the Tree Fund, the Transportation Initiatives
Fund, and the Transportation Infrastructure Project Review Fund; provided further, that there are
appropriated in addition any amounts received, or to be received, without regard to fiscal year,
from the Potomac Electric Power Company, or any of its related companies, successors, or
assigns, for the purpose of paying or reimbursing the District Department of Transportation for
the costs of designing, constructing, acquiring, and installing facilities, infrastructure, and
equipment for use and ownership by the Potomac Electric Power Company, or any of its related
20

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
companies, successors, or assigns, related to or associated with the undergrounding of electric
distribution lines in the District of Columbia, and any interest earned on those funds, which
amounts and interest shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund at the
end of a fiscal year or at any other time, and shall be continually available without regard to
fiscal year limitation until expended for the designated purposes;
(10) Office of the People’s Counsel: $13,986,918 (including $965,048 from local
funds and $13,021,870 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to
fiscal year, into the Office of People’s Counsel Agency Fund are authorized for expenditure and
shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(11) Public Service Commission: $20,835,694 (including $673,990 from federal
grant funds, $20,147,704 from other funds, and $14,000 from private donations); provided, that
all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027: the PJM
Settlement Fund and the Public Service Commission Agency Fund;
(12) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority: $794,447,572 (including
$680,736,572 from local funds, $79,711,000 from dedicated taxes, and $34,000,000 from other
funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2027: the Dedicated Taxes Fund and the Parking Meter WMATA Fund; provided further, that all
funds budgeted without regard to fiscal year for the adult learner transit subsidy program
established by section 6047 of the Student, Foster Youth, Summer Youth Employee, and Adult
Learner Transit Subsidies Act of 2019, effective September 11, 2019 (D.C. Law 23-16; D.C.
Official Code § 35-246), are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027; provided further, that there are appropriated any amounts
deposited, or to be deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Washington Metropolitan
Area Transit Authority Dedicated Financing Fund for the purpose of funding WMATA capital
improvements, which amounts shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General
Fund at the end of a fiscal year or at any other time, and shall be continually available until
expended for the designated purposes; and
(13) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission: $186,785 from local
funds.
FINANCING AND OTHER
For financing and other costs, $2,123,036,314 (including $1,598,539,178 from local
funds, $401,058,277 from dedicated taxes, $822,966 from federal grant funds, $52,615,893 from
other funds, and $70,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the
Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Emergency Planning and Security Costs in the
District of Columbia” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026);
provided, that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of
21

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2027; to be
allocated as follows:
(1) Commercial Paper Program: $17,675,000 from local funds;
(2) Convention Center Transfer: $164,964,000 (including $625,000 from local
funds and $164,339,000 from dedicated taxes);
(3) Debt Service - Issuance Costs: $13,000,000 from local funds for the payment
of debt service issuance costs;
(4) District of Columbia Highway Transportation Fund: $56,674,199 (including
$23,459,000 from dedicated taxes and $33,215,199 from other funds);
(5) District Retiree Health Contribution: $88,300,000 from local funds for a
District Retiree Health Contribution;
(6) Emergency Planning and Security Fund: $70,000,000 from federal payment
funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for
Emergency Planning and Security Costs in the District of Columbia” in the Fiscal Year 2027
Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026; provided, that this amount shall be increased or
decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for
Emergency Planning and Security for Fiscal Year 2027;
(7) John A. Wilson Building Fund: $4,813,842 from local funds for expenses
associated with the John A. Wilson building;
(8) Non-Departmental: $3,186,551 from local funds;
(9) Pay-As-You-Go Capital Fund: $271,051,614 (including $40,650,920 from
local funds, $211,000,000 from dedicated taxes, and $19,400,694 from other funds) to be
transferred to the Capital Fund, in lieu of capital financing;
(10) Repayment of Loans and Interest: $1,300,381,791 (including $1,299,558,825
from local funds and $822,966 from federal grant funds), for payment of principal, interest, and
certain fees directly resulting from borrowing by the District of Columbia to fund District of
Columbia capital projects as authorized by sections 461, 475, and 490 of the District of
Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code §§ 1-
204.61, 1-204.75, and 1-204.90);
(11) Repayment of Revenue Bonds: $2,260,277 from dedicated taxes for the
repayment of revenue bonds;
(12) Settlements and Judgments: $25,344,289 from local funds for making
refunds and for the payment of legal settlements or judgments that have been entered against the
District of Columbia government; provided, that this amount may be increased by such sums as
may be necessary for making refunds and for the payment of legal settlements or judgments that
have been entered against the District of Columbia government and such sums may be paid from
the applicable or available funds of the District of Columbia; and
(13) Workforce Investment Account: $105,384,750 from local funds.
22

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
ENTERPRISE FUNDS
The amount of $2,337,094,182 (including $2,204,033,517 from enterprise and other
funds and $133,060,665 from enterprise and other funds - dedicated taxes), shall be provided to
enterprise funds as follows; provided, that, in the event that revenue dedicated by District law to
an enterprise fund exceeds the amount set forth as follows, the General Fund budget authority
may be increased as needed to transfer all such revenue, pursuant to District law, to the
enterprise fund:
(1) Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund: $37,844,812 (including
$31,714,000 from enterprise and other funds - dedicated taxes and $6,130,812 from enterprise
and other funds);
(2) District of Columbia Retirement Board: $42,116,124 from the earnings of the
applicable retirement funds to pay legal, management, investment, and other fees and
administrative expenses of the District of Columbia Retirement Board;
(3) District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority: $844,105,090 from
enterprise and other funds; provided, that not to exceed $25,000 of this amount shall be available
for reception and representation expenses; provided further, that not to exceed $15,000 of this
amount shall be available for official meetings. For construction projects, $8,913,495,000, to be
distributed as follows: $1,511,294,000 for Wastewater Treatment; $2,541,755,000 for the
Sanitary Sewer System; $2,596,634,000 for the Water System; $227,925,000 for Non Process
Facilities; $1,077,084,000 for the Combined Sewer Overflow Program; $465,010,000 for the
Washington Aqueduct; $110,876,000 for the Stormwater Program; and $382,917,000 for the
capital equipment program; in addition, $8,000,000 for Federal payment funds requested to be
appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment to the District of Columbia
Water and Sewer Authority” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of
2026; provided, that the foregoing amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount
of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2027;
(4) Green Finance Authority: $3,750,000 from enterprise and other funds, to be
available until expended;
(5) Health Benefit Exchange Authority: $47,440,513 from enterprise and other
funds;
(6) Housing Finance Agency: $19,880,400 from enterprise and other funds;
provided, that all funds budgeted without regard to fiscal year for the Reverse Mortgage
Foreclosure Prevention Program are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027; provided further, that all funds budgeted without regard to
fiscal year for the Public Housing Credit-Building Pilot Program are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(7) Housing Production Trust Fund: $62,611,799 (including $52,611,799 from
enterprise and other funds - dedicated taxes and $10,000,000 from enterprise and other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Housing Production
23

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Trust Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027;
(8) Office of Lottery and Gaming: $222,201,452 from enterprise and other funds;
provided, that, after notification to the Mayor, amounts appropriated herein may be increased by
an amount necessary for the Lottery, Gambling, and Gaming Fund to make transfers to the
General Fund and to cover prizes, agent commissions, and gaming-related fees directly
associated with unanticipated excess lottery revenues not included in this appropriation;
(9) Other Post-Employment Benefits Trust Administration: $8,765,834 from
enterprise and other funds;
(10) Repayment of PILOT Financing: $694,425 from enterprise and other funds -
dedicated taxes;
(11) Tax Increment Financing Program: $48,040,442 from enterprise and other
funds - dedicated taxes;
(12) Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund: $216,835,949 from enterprise and
other funds;
(13) Universal Paid Leave Fund: $184,072,729 from enterprise and other funds;
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(14) University of the District of Columbia: $206,440,926 from enterprise and
other funds; provided, that these funds shall not revert to the General Fund at the end of a fiscal
year or at any other time, and shall be continually available for expenditure until September 30,
2027; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Higher
Education Incentive Program Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2027;
(15) Washington Aqueduct: $123,972,126 from enterprise and other funds; and
(16) Washington Convention and Sports Authority: $268,321,563 from enterprise
and other funds.
RESERVE ACCOUNTS
(1) Cash Flow Reserve Account: All funds deposited, without regard to fiscal
year, into the Cash Flow Reserve Account, established pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-
392.02(j-2), are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2027.
(2) Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account: All funds deposited, without regard to
fiscal year, into the Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account, established pursuant to D.C. Official
Code § 47-392.02(j-1), are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure
until September 30, 2027.
CAPITAL OUTLAY
For capital construction projects, a net increase of $3,507,739,000, of which
24

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
$2,584,694,000 shall be from local funds, $803,131,000 shall be from the federal Highway Trust
Fund, $101,876,000 shall be from the District of Columbia Highway Trust Fund, $32,144,000
shall be from federal funds, and a net rescission of $14,104,000, which shall be from local
transportation funds, to remain available until expended; provided, that all funds provided by this
act shall be available only for the specific projects and purposes intended; provided further, that
amounts appropriated under this act may be increased by the amount transferred from funds
appropriated in this act as Pay-As-You-Go Capital funds.
APPROPRIATION OF ADDITIONAL RESOURCES
(1) Fiscal Year 2026 and Fiscal Year 2027 Additional Revenues.
(A) To the extent that the Fiscal Year 2026 local revenues certified in the
June 2026, September 2026, or December 2026 quarterly revenue estimates exceed the local
revenue estimate of the Chief Financial Officer dated February 27, 2026, together with revenue
generated from the Fiscal Year 2027 Budget Support Act and transfers authorized by the Fiscal
Year 2026 Revised Local Budget Adjustment Emergency Act, the first $150 million of excess
local funds shall be deposited in the Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account, established pursuant
to D.C. Official Code § 47-392.02(j-1), (“Account”) to restore funds transferred to the General
Fund pursuant to section 5 of the Fiscal Year 2026 Revised Local Budget Adjustment
Emergency Act of 2026, passed on an emergency basis on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of
Bill 26-662).
(B) If the Fiscal Year 2026 excess local funds described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph equal less than $150 million, then, to the extent that the Fiscal Year 2027
local revenues certified in the June 2026, September 2026, or December 2026 quarterly revenue
estimates exceed the resources otherwise appropriated in this act for Fiscal Year 2027, the excess
local funds shall be deposited in the Account in the amount necessary, when combined with the
amount deposited pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, to equal $150 million.
(2)(A) After satisfaction of the conditions specified in paragraph (1) under this
heading, the amount appropriated as local funds under this act shall be increased by up to
$50,000,000, which amount shall be authorized for obligation and expenditure pursuant to
subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph, if and to the extent that the Fiscal Year 2027 local
revenues certified in the June 2026, September 2026, or December 2026 quarterly revenue
estimates exceed amounts otherwise appropriated under this act.
(B) Fiscal Year 2027 excess local funds certified in the June 2026 and
September 2026 quarterly revenue estimates shall be allocated as follows no later than October
1, 2026:
(i) The first $9,000,000 in one-time funds to Non-Departmental for
transfer to the District of Columbia Housing Authority for use in the event the federal emergency
housing voucher program expires;
(ii) The next $3,000,000 in one-time funds to the Department of
25

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Human Services for the Emergency Rental Assistance Program;
(iii) The next $2,000,000, in one-time funds to the Department of
Youth Rehabilitative Services for the Credible Messengers program; and
(iv) The next $36,000,000 in one-time funds to the Workforce
Investment Account.
(C) Fiscal Year 2027 excess local funds certified in the December 2026
quarterly revenue estimate shall be allocated, no later than January 1, 2027, to any agency,
program, or account, in the order of priority identified in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, that
was not fully funded pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § l-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
26

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
27